Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 52

Incorporation

48-52-101. Incorporators.

One (1) or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering a charter to the secretary of state for filing. If any incorporator dies or is for any reason unable to act, the other incorporators, if any, may act. If there is no incorporator able to act, any person for whom an incorporator was acting as agent may act in the incorporator's stead or, if such other person also dies or is for any reason unable to act, or the incorporator was not acting as an agent, the incorporator's legal representative may act.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 2.01.

Cross-References. Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Business corporations, incorporation, title 48, ch. 12.

Qualified applicability of Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

Trusts for perpetual care of private cemeteries, title 46, ch. 7.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 8.

48-52-102. Charter.

The charter must set forth:

A corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the requirements of § 48-54-101;

One (1) of the following statements:

This corporation is a public benefit corporation; or

This corporation is a mutual benefit corporation;

If the corporation is a religious corporation, a statement to that effect;

The street address and zip code of the corporation's initial registered office, the county in which the office is located, and the name of its initial registered agent at that office;

The name, address and zip code of each incorporator;

The street address and zip code of the initial principal office, and a mailing address if the United States Postal Service does not deliver to the principal office, of the corporation;

A statement that the corporation is not for profit;

A statement that the corporation will or will not have members; and

Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding the distribution of assets upon dissolution.

The charter may set forth:

The names and addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors;

Provisions not inconsistent with law:

Stating the purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized;

Regarding the management of the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation; and

Defining, limiting and regulating the powers and rights of the corporation, its board of directors and members or any class thereof;

A provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the corporation or its members for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director; provided, that such provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For any breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the corporation or its members;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; or

Under § 48-58-302;

No such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective;

All references in this subsection (b) to a “director” are also deemed to refer to a member of the governing body of a corporation which dispenses with or limits the authority of the board of directors pursuant to § 48-58-101(c);

Any provision that under chapters 51-68 of this title is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws;

A provision permitting or making obligatory indemnification of a director for liability to any person for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

Receipt of a financial benefit to which the director is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm;

A violation of § 48-58-302; or

An intentional violation of criminal law; and

For purposes of subdivision (b)(5)(A):

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine, including excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan, as reasonable expenses incurred with respect to a proceeding; and

“Proceeding” includes a threatened, pending or completed proceeding;

That the liability of a director of a corporation that is not a public benefit corporation may be eliminated or limited by a provision of the charter that a director shall not be liable to the corporation or its members for money damages for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

The amount of a financial benefit received by the director to which the director is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm;

A violation of § 48-58-302; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

The charter need not set forth any of the corporate powers enumerated in chapters 51-68 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 2.02; 1991, ch. 188, § 2; 2014, ch. 899, §§ 16–19.

Cross-References. Applicability to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1401, 8-502.

Attorney General Opinions. Amending a nonprofit corporation's charter, OAG 00-029, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (2/22/00).

48-52-103. Incorporation.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence begins when the charter is filed by the secretary of state.

The secretary of state's filing of the charter is conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation, except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 2.03.

Cross-References. Proof of incorporation in criminal cases, § 40-17-117.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1401.

48-52-104. Liability for preincorporation transactions.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, knowing there was no incorporation under chapters 51-68 of this title, are jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting, except for any liability to any person who knew or reasonably should have known that there was no incorporation.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 2.04.

48-52-105. Organization of corporation.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are named in the charter, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws, and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting;

If initial directors are not named in the charter, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators and upon two (2) days' notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting to:

Elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or

Elect a board of directors who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

Action required or permitted by chapters 51-68 of this title to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting. If all incorporators consent to taking such action without a meeting, the affirmative vote of the number of incorporators that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting is the act of the incorporators. The action must be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each incorporator in one (1) or more counterparts, indicating each signing incorporator's vote or abstention on the action, and shall be included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 2.05.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1501, 5-1601.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 8.

48-52-106. Bylaws — Limitations on liability.

The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the charter.

The bylaws may contain a provision permitting or requiring indemnification of a director for liability to any person for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

Receipt of a financial benefit to which the director is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm;

A violation of § 48-58-302 (unlawful distribution); or

An intentional violation of criminal law; and

For purposes of this subsection (c):

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine, including excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan, as reasonable expenses incurred with respect to a proceeding; and

“Proceeding” includes a threatened, pending or completed proceeding.

The liability of a director of a nonprofit corporation that is not a public benefit corporation may be eliminated or limited by a provision of the bylaws that a director shall not be liable to the corporation or its members for money damages for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

The amount of a financial benefit received by the director to which the director is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm;

A violation of § 48-58-302; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 2.06; 2014, ch. 899, § 20.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1502, 5-1503, 5-1602, 5-1603.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 17.

48-52-107. Emergency bylaws.

Unless the charter provides otherwise, the board of directors or the incorporators of a corporation may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency. The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the members, may make all provisions necessary for managing the corporation during the emergency, including:

Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee or agent.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 2.07.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 17.